Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,106
Special reserve account.

In addition to the regular reserve account, a special reserve account to protect the interest of the members shall be established when required by rule or regulation or when found by the board of directors of the credit union or by the director, in any special case, to be necessary for that purpose.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 106;

Laws 1997, LB 137, § 16.